Colorado, session 2026A, HB1280.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, amend
(27)(a)(XV); and add (38)(a)(II) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(27) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2026:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(XV) The regulation of dialysis treatment clinics and hemodialysis
technicians in accordance with section 25-1.5-108;
(38) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2037:
(II) THE REGULATION OF DIALYSIS TREATMENT CLINICS AND
HEMODIALYSIS TECHNICIANS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25-1.5-108.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-1.5-108, amend (6)
as follows:
25-1.5-108. Regulation of dialysis treatment clinics - training for
hemodialysis technicians - state board of health rules - definitions -
repeal.
(6) This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2026
SEPTEMBER 1, 2037. Before the repeal, this section is scheduled for review
in accordance with section 24-34-104.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1280

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1280